Hawaii statutes.
§412:5-407 Same powers and duties as
banks. An intra-Pacific bank engaged in banking in this State shall have
all powers and duties allowed by and imposed on all banks chartered by this
State, including without limitation the authority to accept deposits, make
loans, borrow money and make investments, and the duty to file reports with the
commissioner and insure its deposits in this State with a federal agency. An
intra-Pacific bank shall also be subject to and liable for all fines and
penalties provided by this chapter. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next